Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.253

Liability coverage of university personnel and students—Self-insurance revolving fund.

(1) A self-insurance revolving fund in the custody of the university is hereby created to be used solely and exclusively by the board of regents of the University of Washington for the following purposes:

(a) The payment of judgments against the university, its schools, colleges, departments, and hospitals and against its regents, officers, employees, agents, and students for whom the defense of an action, claim, or proceeding has been provided pursuant to RCW 28B.20.250.

(b) The payment of claims against the university, its schools, colleges, departments, and hospitals and against its regents, officers, employees, agents, and students for whom the defense of an action, claim, or proceeding has been provided pursuant to RCW 28B.20.250: PROVIDED, That payment of claims in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars must be approved by the state attorney general.

(c) For the cost of investigation, administration, and defense of actions, claims, or proceedings, and other purposes essential to its liability program.

(2) Said self-insurance revolving fund shall consist of periodic payments by the University of Washington from any source available to it in such amounts as are deemed reasonably necessary to maintain the fund at levels adequate to provide for the anticipated cost of payments of incurred claims and other costs to be charged against the fund.

(3) No money shall be paid from the self-insurance revolving fund unless first approved by the board of regents, and unless all proceeds available to the claimant from any valid and collectible liability insurance shall have been exhausted.

[ 1997 c 288 s 1; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 117; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.